Hawaii statutes.
[§87A-21] Eligibility. (a) The board
shall establish eligibility criteria to determine who can qualify as an
employee-beneficiary, dependent-beneficiary, or qualified-beneficiary,
consistent with the provisions of this chapter.

(b) A retired member of the employees'
retirement system; a county pension system; or a police, firefighters, and
bandsmen pension system of the State or county, shall be eligible to qualify as
an employee-beneficiary:

(1) Regardless of whether the retired member was
actively employed by the State or county at the time of the retired employee's
retirement; and

(2) Without regard to the date of the retired
member's retirement.

(c) A dependent of a retired member shall be
eligible to qualify as an employee-beneficiary or dependent-beneficiary:

(1) Regardless of whether the retired member was
actively employed by the State or county at the time of the retired employee's
retirement; and

(2) Without regard to the date of the retired
member's retirement. [L 2001, c 88, pt of §1]

Case Notes

A retired employee's health benefits that are included in a
health benefits plan falls within the constitutional protection contemplated by
article XVI, §2 of the Hawaii constitution inasmuch as subsection (b)
clearly and unambiguously conditions a retired state or county government
employee's eligibility for health benefits on, inter alia, being a retired
member of the employees' retirement system. 122 H. 402, 228 P.3d 282.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next